test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
      puud+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: puudaski
      puud+N+Sg+Ill: puuda
      puud+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: puudagi
      puud+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: puudassegi
      puud+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: puudasse
      puud+N+Sg+Gen: puuda
      puud+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: puudagi
      puud+N+Sg+Par: puuda
      puud+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: puudagi
      puud+N+Pl+Nom: puudad
      puud+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: puudadki
      puud+N+Pl+Par: puudasid
      puud+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: puudasidki
      puud+N+Pl+Com: puudadega
      puud+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: puudadegagi
      puud+N+Pl+Abe: puudadeta
      puud+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: puudadetagi
      puud+N+Pl+Ess: puudadena
      puud+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: puudadenagi
      puud+N+Pl+Trm: puudadeni
      puud+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: puudadenigi
      puud+N+Pl+Tra: puudadeks
      puud+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: puudadekski
      puud+N+Pl+Abl: puudadelt
      puud+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: puudadeltki
      puud+N+Pl+Ade: puudadel
      puud+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: puudadelgi
      puud+N+Pl+All: puudadele
      puud+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: puudadelegi
      puud+N+Pl+Ela: puudadest
      puud+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: puudadestki
      puud+N+Pl+Ine: puudades
      puud+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: puudadeski
      puud+N+Pl+Ill: puudadesse
      puud+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: puudadessegi
      puud+N+Pl+Gen: puudade
      puud+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: puudadegi
      puud+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: puudigi
      puud+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: puudi
      puu+N+Pl+Com: puudega
      puu+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: puudegagi
      puu+N+Pl+Abe: puudeta
      puu+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: puudetagi
      puu+N+Pl+Ess: puudena
      puu+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: puudenagi
      puu+N+Pl+Trm: puudeni
      puu+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: puudenigi
      puu+N+Pl+Tra: puudeks
      puu+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: puudekski
      puu+N+Pl+Abl: puudelt
      puu+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: puudeltki
      puu+N+Pl+Ade: puudel
      puu+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: puudelgi
      puu+N+Pl+All: puudele
      puu+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: puudelegi
      puu+N+Pl+Ela: puudest
      puu+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: puudestki
      puu+N+Pl+Ine: puudes
      puu+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: puudeski
      puu+N+Pl+Ill: puudesse
      puu+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: puudessegi
      puu+N+Pl+Gen: puude
      puu+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: puudegi
      päike+N+Sg+Par: päikest
      päike+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: päikestki
      päike+N+Sg+Com: päikesega
      päike+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: päikesegagi
      päike+N+Sg+Abe: päikeseta
      päike+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: päikesetagi
      päike+N+Sg+Ess: päikesena
      päike+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: päikesenagi
      päike+N+Sg+Trm: päikeseni
      päike+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: päikesenigi
      päike+N+Sg+Tra: päikeseks
      päike+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: päikesekski
      päike+N+Sg+Abl: päikeselt
      päike+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: päikeseltki
      päike+N+Sg+Ade: päikesel
      päike+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: päikeselgi
      päike+N+Sg+All: päikesele
      päike+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: päikeselegi
      päike+N+Sg+Ela: päikesest
      päike+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: päikesestki
      päike+N+Sg+Ine: päikeses
      päike+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: päikeseski
      päike+N+Sg+Gen: päikese
      päike+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: päikesegi
      päike+N+Pl+Nom: päikesed
      päike+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: päikesedki
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: päikeseiks
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikeseikski
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: päikeseilt
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikeseiltki
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: päikeseil
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikeseilgi
      päike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: päikeseile
      päike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikeseilegi
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: päikeseist
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikeseistki
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: päikeseis
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikeseiski
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: päikeseisse
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikeseissegi
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: päikesiks
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesikski
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: päikesilt
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesiltki
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: päikesil
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesilgi
      päike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: päikesile
      päike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesilegi
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: päikesist
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesistki
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: päikesis
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesiski
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: päikesisse
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesissegi
      päike+N+Pl+Com: päikestega
      päike+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: päikestegagi
      päike+N+Pl+Abe: päikesteta
      päike+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: päikestetagi
      päike+N+Pl+Ess: päikestena
      päike+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: päikestenagi
      päike+N+Pl+Trm: päikesteni
      päike+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: päikestenigi
      päike+N+Pl+Tra: päikesteks
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: päikestekski
      päike+N+Pl+Abl: päikestelt
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: päikesteltki
      päike+N+Pl+Ade: päikestel
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: päikestelgi
      päike+N+Pl+All: päikestele
      päike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: päikestelegi
      päike+N+Pl+Ela: päikestest
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: päikestestki
      päike+N+Pl+Ine: päikestes
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: päikesteski
      päike+N+Pl+Ill: päikestesse
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: päikestessegi
      päike+N+Pl+Gen: päikeste
      päike+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: päikestegi
      päike+N+Sg+Com+Use/Rare: päiksega
      päike+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksegagi
      päike+N+Sg+Abe+Use/Rare: päikseta
      päike+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetagi
      päike+N+Sg+Ess+Use/Rare: päiksena
      päike+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksenagi
      päike+N+Sg+Trm+Use/Rare: päikseni
      päike+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksenigi
      päike+N+Sg+Tra+Use/Rare: päikseks
      päike+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksekski
      päike+N+Sg+Abl+Use/Rare: päikselt
      päike+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseltki
      päike+N+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: päiksel
      päike+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikselgi
      päike+N+Sg+All+Use/Rare: päiksele
      päike+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikselegi
      päike+N+Sg+Ela+Use/Rare: päiksest
      päike+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksestki
      päike+N+Sg+Ine+Use/Rare: päikses
      päike+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseski
      päike+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksegi
      päike+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Rare: päikse
      päike+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksedki
      päike+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Rare: päiksed
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: päikseiks
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseikski
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: päikseilt
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseiltki
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: päikseil
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseilgi
      päike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: päikseile
      päike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseilegi
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: päikseist
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseistki
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: päikseis
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseiski
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: päikseisse
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseissegi
      päike+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: päiksetega
      päike+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetegagi
      päike+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: päikseteta
      päike+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetetagi
      päike+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: päiksetena
      päike+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetenagi
      päike+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: päikseteni
      päike+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetenigi
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: päikseteks
      päike+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetekski
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: päiksetelt
      päike+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseteltki
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: päiksetel
      päike+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetelgi
      päike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: päiksetele
      päike+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetelegi
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: päiksetest
      päike+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetestki
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: päiksetes
      päike+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseteski
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: päiksetesse
      päike+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetessegi
      päike+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetegi
      päike+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: päiksete
      päike+N+Pl+Par: päikeseid
      päike+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: päikeseidki
      päike+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikesigi
      päike+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: päikesi
      päike+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikseidki
      päike+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: päikseid
      päike+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: päikesse
      päike+N+Sg+Ill: päikesesse
      päike+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: päikesessegi
      päike+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikessegi
      päike+N+Sg+Nom: päike
      päike+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: päikegi
      päike+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päikenegi
      päike+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Rare: päikene
      päike+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksetki
      päike+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: päikset
      päike+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: päiksessegi
      päike+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: päiksesse
      põlv+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põligi
      põlv+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Rare: põli
      põlv+N+Sg+Nom: põlv
      põlv+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: põlvgi
      põlv+N+Sg+Com: põlvega
      põlv+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: põlvegagi
      põlv+N+Sg+Abe: põlveta
      põlv+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: põlvetagi
      põlv+N+Sg+Ess: põlvena
      põlv+N+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: põlvenagi
      põlv+N+Sg+Trm: põlveni
      põlv+N+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: põlvenigi
      põlv+N+Sg+Tra: põlveks
      põlv+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: põlvekski
      põlv+N+Sg+Abl: põlvelt
      põlv+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: põlveltki
      põlv+N+Sg+Ade: põlvel
      põlv+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: põlvelgi
      põlv+N+Sg+All: põlvele
      põlv+N+Sg+All+Foc/gi: põlvelegi
      põlv+N+Sg+Ela: põlvest
      põlv+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: põlvestki
      põlv+N+Sg+Ine: põlves
      põlv+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: põlveski
      põlv+N+Sg+Ill: põlve
      põlv+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: põlvegi
      põlv+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: põlvessegi
      põlv+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: põlvesse
      põlv+N+Sg+Gen: põlve
      põlv+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: põlvegi
      põlv+N+Sg+Par: põlve
      põlv+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: põlvegi
      põlv+N+Pl+Nom: põlved
      põlv+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: põlvedki
      põlv+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlvesidki
      põlv+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: põlvesid
      põlv+N+Pl+Com: põlvedega
      põlv+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: põlvedegagi
      põlv+N+Pl+Abe: põlvedeta
      põlv+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: põlvedetagi
      põlv+N+Pl+Ess: põlvedena
      põlv+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: põlvedenagi
      põlv+N+Pl+Trm: põlvedeni
      põlv+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: põlvedenigi
      põlv+N+Pl+Tra: põlvedeks
      põlv+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: põlvedekski
      põlv+N+Pl+Abl: põlvedelt
      põlv+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: põlvedeltki
      põlv+N+Pl+Ade: põlvedel
      põlv+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: põlvedelgi
      põlv+N+Pl+All: põlvedele
      põlv+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi: põlvedelegi
      põlv+N+Pl+Ela: põlvedest
      põlv+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: põlvedestki
      põlv+N+Pl+Ine: põlvedes
      põlv+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: põlvedeski
      põlv+N+Pl+Ill: põlvedesse
      põlv+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: põlvedessegi
      põlv+N+Pl+Gen: põlvede
      põlv+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: põlvedegi
      põlv+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: põlviks
      põlv+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlvikski
      põlv+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: põlvilt
      põlv+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlviltki
      põlv+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: põlvil
      põlv+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlvilgi
      põlv+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: põlvile
      põlv+N+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlvilegi
      põlv+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: põlvist
      põlv+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlvistki
      põlv+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: põlvis
      põlv+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlviski
      põlv+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: põlvisse
      põlv+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlvissegi
      põlv+N+Pl+Par: põlvi
      põlv+N+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: põlvigi
      põlv+N+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: põlvinigi
      põlv+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: põlvini
      pöial+N+Sg+Nom: pöial
      pöial+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: pöialgi
      pöial+N+Sg+Par: pöialt
      pöial+N+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: pöialtki
      pöial+N+Pl+Com: pöialdega
      pöial+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: pöialdegagi
      pöial+N+Pl+Abe: pöialdeta
      pöial+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: pöialdetagi
      pöial+N+Pl+Ess: pöialdena
      pöial+N+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: pöialdenagi
